Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-256
General partners; powers and liabilities.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the partnership and the other partners. Except as otherwise provided in the act or in the partnership agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 24;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 31.